vi: Hệ điều hành: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Đa nền tảng; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Cửa sổ; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Khác
cs: Operační systém: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Více platforem; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Okna; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Jiné
lt-LT: Operacinė sistema: „Android“; „Android TV“; „Chrome OS“; Daugiaplatformis; „Fire OS“; „FreeBSD“; „Linux“; „Raspberry Pi OS“; „Tizen“; „Unix“; „Windows“; „iOS“; „macOS“; „tvOS“; „watchOS“; „webOS“; Kita
bg-BG: Операционна система: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Междуплатформена; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Windows; iOS; macOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Други
zh-CN: 操作系统: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; 跨平台; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; 窗; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; 其他
zh-TW: 作業系統: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; 跨平臺; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; 窗; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; 其他
de: Betriebssystem: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Plattformübergreifend; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Fenster; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Operativni sustav: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Višeplatformski; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Windows; iOS; macOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Ostalo
ro-RO: Sistem de operare: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Multiplatformă; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Windows; iOS; macOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Altele
fi: Käyttöjärjestelmät: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Monialustainen; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Ikkunat; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Muu
nb: Operativsystem: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Kryssplattform; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Vinduer; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Annet
sl-SI: Operacijski sistem: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Cross-platform; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Windows; iOS; macOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Drugo
pt-PT: Sistema operativo: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Multiplataforma; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Janelas; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Outro
ru: Операционная система: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Кроссплатформенный; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Windows; iOS; macOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Другой
ko: 운영체제: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; 크로스 플랫폼; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; 라즈베리 파이 OS; Tizen; Unix; 창; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; 기타
tr: İşletim Sistemi: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Platformlar arası; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Pencereler; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Diğer
sv: Operativsystem: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Cross-plattform; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Fönster; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Övrigt
it: Sistema operativo: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Multipiattaforma; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Windows; iOS; macOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Altro
pl: System operacyjny: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Wieloplatformowy; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Okna; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Inne
ja: オペレーティングシステム: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; クロスプラットフォーム; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; 窓; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; その他
en: Operating system: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Cross-platform; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Windows; iOS; macOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Other
da: Operativsystem: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Cross-platform; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Vinduer; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Andet
el: Λειτουργικό σύστημα: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Για όλες τις πλτφόρμες; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Παράθυρα; iOS; macOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Άλλο
sk-SK: Operačný systém: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Multiplatformový; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; OS Raspberry Pi; Tizen; Unix; Windows; iOS; macOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Iné
th: ระบบการทำงาน: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; ข้ามแพลตฟอร์ม; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; หน้าต่าง; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; อื่นๆ
es: Sistema operativo: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Multiplataforma; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Ventanas; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Otros
nl: Besturingssysteem: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Platformoverstijgend; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Ramen; iOS; macOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Andere
pt-BR: Sistemas operacionais: Android; Android TV; Sistema operacional Chrome; Cross-platform; Sistema operacional Fire; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Janelas; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Outro
fr: Système d’exploitation: Android; Android TV; Système d’exploitation Chrome; Multiplateforme; Système d’exploitation Fire; FreeBSD; Linux; Système d’exploitation Raspberry Pi; Tizen; Unix; Fenêtres; iOS; MacOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Autre
hu: Operációs rendszer: Android; Android TV; Chrome OS; Többplatformos; Fire OS; FreeBSD; Linux; Raspberry Pi OS; Tizen; Unix; Windows; iOS; macOS; tvOS; watchOS; webOS; Egyéb